Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-225
Constitutional convention; rules and regulations; adopt.

The constitutional convention shall have authority to (1) determine its own rules and proceedings; (2) elect such officers as it may deem necessary for the proper and convenient transaction of the business of the convention and prescribe their duties; (3) make provisions for the publication of its proceedings or any part thereof; and (4) provide for the securing of a copyright of any such publication for the state.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 14, p. 552.